Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-101
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds the duty of adjoining landowners for the construction and maintenance
of division fences to be beneficial to the public interest and welfare. Such
benefits are not confined to historical and traditional societal benefits
that accrue from the proper constraint of livestock, but also include suppression
of civil disputes and public and private nuisances and the protection of public
safety. Division fences promote the peace and security of society by the demarcation
of rural boundaries, physical separation of conflicting land uses, enhancement
of privacy, diminishment of frequency of public burden imposed by incidences
of trespass and adverse possession, and the mitigation of impacts of conflicting
land use intrusion into those areas of the state devoted to agricultural and
horticultural use.

Laws 2010, LB667, § 1.